Vermont, session 2025-2026, H180.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) Communities and their community elementary schools should be
afforded due process on a case-by-case basis before an elementary school is
closed. Elementary schools are not all the same.
(2) Before closing a community elementary school:
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 2 of 8
(A) The community, including students, parents, community
members, and teachers, should have a meaningful voice.
(B) The educational benefits of the school for students should be
carefully considered, especially for at-risk students from historically
marginalized groups, students from households with low income, and
ethnically or linguistically diverse households.
(C) The financial savings associated with closing the school should
be objectively analyzed based on credible data, and those financial savings
should be measured against all other reasonable savings options.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 726 is added to read:
§ 726. CLOSING AN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Close an elementary school” means ceasing to provide educational
instruction to all students in the elementary school, or to any subset of grades
as they exist as of the date of the proposal to close the elementary school.
(2) “Elementary school” means an educational facility for the instruction
of students in any configuration of grades prekindergarten through grade eight.
“Elementary school” includes an elementary school governed by a union
school district and by any other school district governed by an entity that has
the authority to close an elementary school without the agreement or consent
of the school district or votes of the town or other locality wherein the
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 3 of 8
elementary school is located. “Elementary school” does not include an
elementary school governed by a school district that is exclusively responsible
for that elementary school.
(b) Closure report.
(1) Before closing an elementary school, a school district shall provide
public notice of its intent to close the elementary school at least nine months
before issuing its elementary school closure report and publish an elementary
school closure report not later than 90 days before making a final decision.
(2) The district shall provide students, families, community members,
teachers, and others a meaningful opportunity to consider and offer comments
concerning the report and to file objections to the conclusions reached in the
report. Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 316(c) and (d), the district shall respond
promptly, without charge, to reasonable requests for the then-existing data and
assumptions on which the report is based.
(3) The report shall demonstrate, based on credible data, and based on
competent, reasonable, and independent analysis of the educational impacts on
students, whether:
(A) student proficiency scores, social-emotional health, and other
measures of student outcomes will improve as a result of the closure; and
(B) students from historically marginalized households with
marginalized demographics, including students from households with low
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 4 of 8
income and students from ethnically and linguistically diverse households, will
not experience adverse educational outcomes from moving from a local
elementary school to a larger school located outside the community.
(4) The report shall demonstrate, based on credible data and based on
competent, reasonable, and independent financial analysis, whether:
(A) A reasonable and credible amount has been ascribed to the
financial savings that can be attributed to closing the elementary school.
(B) Financial savings options have been considered as alternatives to
closing the elementary school and those alternative financial savings, in the
aggregate, are less than the amount credibly ascribed to closing the elementary
school. Consideration of alternative financial savings shall include:
(i) the most cost-effective number of central office staff, facility-
based administrative staff, and other staff not engaged in direct education to
students;
(ii) whether collaboration between or consolidation of central
office administrative and management personnel and functions in neighboring
or regional school districts can reduce administrative costs, after determining
the reasonable amount associated with such collaboration or consolidation;
(iii) whether collaboration between neighboring or regional high
schools and technical centers can reduce costs, after determining the
reasonable amount associated with such collaboration; and
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 5 of 8
(iv) any other alternative financial savings.
(5) The report shall provide credible and reasonable information on
student transport. The student transport portion of the report shall include the
standard used by the district to measure whether transport times for students
are reasonable, as well as information specifying the time students will spend
being transported from their individual home to a new school and back again.
The report shall determine whether those transport times are reasonable and
feasible after considering geographic locations, typical road conditions in
inclement weather, the age and grade level of students, factors affecting
students with special needs, and any other relevant considerations. Times
specified shall be specific to each drop off or pick up location, rather than
“average” transport times. State standards relating to transport times for
different grade cohorts shall be included in the report, but such standards are
not determinative on whether proposed transport times are reasonable and
feasible. If an elementary school is closed, families of students whose
transport times are not reasonable or feasible may attend a public elementary
school outside the district, at the tuition expense of the original district.
(6) The report shall describe for students, parents, and the community
what happens next for the education of students after the school closes,
including a reasonable plan for the use of the school building after it is closed,
whether or not the municipality chooses to accept ownership of the building.
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 6 of 8
(7) The report shall demonstrate, based on credible data and on
competent, reasonable, and independent analysis of educational and financial
considerations, whether:
(A) the educational and financial benefits from closing the
elementary school outweigh the negative impacts from closing the elementary
school on the demographic and economic viability and vitality of the town the
school is located within and the community; and
(B) closing the elementary school will have a material impact on
reducing education property tax rates in the district.
(c) Closure decision. After the conclusion of the report process established
in subsection (b) of this section, the district shall make a decision as to whether
closing the elementary school is just, reasonable, and supported by the
evidence; improves student outcomes; and will promote the general good of
the State. If the foregoing question is answered by the district in the
affirmative:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in the case of
a district in which the articles of agreement require the affirmative vote of the
town in which the elementary school is located before the school is closed,
there shall be a vote of the town in which the elementary school is located,
whether an affirmative vote is required by reason of the text of the warned
consolidation article or required otherwise in the text of the articles of
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 7 of 8
agreement. In such cases, the district shall not close the elementary school in
the absence of an affirmative vote of the town.
(2)(A) In the case of articles of agreement that do not require the
affirmative vote of the town in which the elementary school is located before
the school is closed, the town, at the discretion of the selectboard, may hold an
advisory vote on school closure. The district’s decision, together with its
report, as amended by the district as warranted, and the town’s advisory vote,
if conducted, shall be transmitted to the Board of Education for a decision on
whether to close the elementary school. The Board’s decision shall be made
after notice and an opportunity to be heard. Party status shall be granted to the
selectboard of the municipality within which the school is located, and to any
20 registered voters of the municipality within which the school is located
acting in concert who so request party status. The Board shall not issue a
decision to close an elementary school unless the Board determines, after
administrative hearing pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, based on a
preponderance of the evidence, that:
(i) the district’s decision is adequately supported by the law and
by the facts included in the district’s decision and report, and by any other
evidence or argument offered by the parties at the Board’s administrative
hearing;
VT LEG #379263 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.180
2025 Page 8 of 8
(ii) the town’s advisory vote on opposition to school closure
should not be accorded deference, and the reasons therefore; and
(iii) the district’s decision is just, reasonable, and supported by the
evidence; improves student outcomes; will have a material impact on reducing
education property tax rates in other school districts in the State; and is in
furtherance of the public good.
(B) The decision of the Board to close an elementary school may be
appealed to the Washington County Superior Court pursuant to V.R.C.P. Rule
74. The Superior Court shall hear the appeal de novo, on the record
transmitted by the Board of Education. The decision of a school district to
close an elementary school and a decision of the Board to uphold the district’s
decision shall not be given administrative deference by the Superior Court in a
proceeding challenging the validity of such decisions. A decision by the
Board to keep an elementary school open shall not be subject to appeal under
this subdivision (c)(2)(B).
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379263 v.4